test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tialanw19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - `tialanõ: # Noun (19) `tialanõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Nom: tialanõ
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Gen: tialasõ
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Par: tialast
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Ill: tialastõ
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Ine: [tialasõn, tialasõh, tialasõhn]
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Ela: tialasõst
     tialanõ+N+Sg+All: tialasõlõ
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Ade: tialasõl
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Abl: tialasõlt
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Tra: tialasõs
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Ter: tialasõniq
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Abe: tialasõldaq
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Com: tialasõgaq
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Nom: tialasõq
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Gen: [tialaisi, tialastõ]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Par: tialaisi
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Ill: [tialaisihõ, tialaisi, tialaisidõ]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Ine: [tialaisin, tialaisih, tialaisihn, tialastõn, tialastõh, tialastõhn]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Ela: [tialaisist, tialastõst]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+All: [tialaisilõ, tialastõlõ]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Ade: [tialaisil, tialastõl]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Abl: [tialaisilt, tialastõlt]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Tra: [tialaisis, tialastõs]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Ter: [tialaisiniq, tialastõniq]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Abe: [tialaisildaq, tialastõldaq]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Com: [tialaisigaq, tialastõgaq]
